Florida, session 2026, SB1720.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 19 1012.22, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 20 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 21 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 22 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 23 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 24 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 25 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 26 chapter: 27 (c)âCompensation and salary schedules.â 28 1.âDefinitions.âAs used in this paragraph: 29 a.ââAdjustmentâ means an addition to the base salary 30 schedule that is not a bonus and becomes part of the employeeâs 31 permanent base salary and shall be considered compensation under 32 s. 121.021(22). 33 b.ââGrandfathered salary scheduleâ means the salary 34 schedule or schedules adopted by a district school board before 35 July 1, 2014, pursuant to subparagraph 4. 36 c.ââInstructional personnelâ means instructional personnel 37 as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a)-(d), excluding substitute 38 teachers. 39 d.ââPerformance salary scheduleâ means the salary schedule 40 or schedules adopted by a district school board pursuant to 41 subparagraph 5. 42 e.ââSalary scheduleâ means the schedule or schedules used 43 to provide the base salary for district school board personnel. 44 f.ââSchool administratorâ means a school administrator as 45 defined in s. 1012.01(3)(c). 46 g.ââSupplementâ means an annual addition to the base salary 47 for the term of the negotiated supplement as long as the 48 employee continues his or her employment for the purpose of the 49 supplement. A supplement does not become part of the employeeâs 50 continuing base salary but shall be considered compensation 51 under s. 121.021(22). 52 2.âCost-of-living adjustment.âA district school board may 53 provide a cost-of-living salary adjustment to employees with 54 direct student contact, including, but not limited to, 55 instructional personnel as defined in s. 1012.01(2), 56 noninstructional personnel, and school administrators as defined 57 in s. 1012.01(3)(c), if the adjustment: 58 a.âdoes not discriminate among comparable classes of 59 employees based upon the salary schedule under which they are 60 compensated. A cost-of-living adjustment does not preclude a 61 district school board from providing other salary adjustments 62 from additional funding sources, including categorical funding 63 and the classroom teacher and other instructional personnel 64 salary increase under s. 1011.62(14) and supplemental funding 65 sources, including grants. 66 b.âDoes not exceed 50 percent of the annual adjustment 67 provided to instructional personnel rated as effective. 68 3.âAdvanced degrees.âA district school board may use 69 advanced degrees in setting a salary schedule for instructional 70 personnel or school administrators if the advanced degree is 71 held in the individualâs area of certification, a field related 72 to his or her teaching assignment, or a related field of study. 73 For purposes of the salary schedule, an advanced degree may 74 include a masterâs degree or higher in the individualâs area of 75 certification or teaching assignment, or an advanced degree in 76 another field with a minimum of 18 graduate semester hours 77 related to the individualâs area of certification or teaching 78 assignment. 79 4.âGrandfathered salary schedule.â 80 a.âThe district school board shall adopt a salary schedule 81 or salary schedules to be used as the basis for paying all 82 school employees hired before July 1, 2014. Instructional 83 personnel on annual contract as of July 1, 2014, shall be placed 84 on the performance salary schedule adopted under subparagraph 5. 85 Instructional personnel on continuing contract or professional 86 service contract may opt into the performance salary schedule if 87 the employee relinquishes such contract and agrees to be 88 employed on an annual contract under s. 1012.335. Such an 89 employee shall be placed on the performance salary schedule and 90 may not return to continuing contract or professional service 91 contract status. Any employee who opts into the performance 92 salary schedule may not return to the grandfathered salary 93 schedule. 94 b.âIn determining the grandfathered salary schedule for 95 instructional personnel, a district school board must base a 96 portion of each employeeâs compensation upon performance 97 demonstrated under s. 1012.34 and shall provide differentiated 98 pay for both instructional personnel and school administrators 99 based upon district-determined factors, including, but not 100 limited to, additional responsibilities, school demographics, 101 high-demand teacher needs areas, advanced degrees, and level of 102 job performance difficulties. 103 5.âPerformance salary schedule.âBy July 1, 2014, The 104 district school board shall adopt a performance salary schedule 105 that provides annual salary adjustments for instructional 106 personnel and school administrators based upon performance 107 determined under s. 1012.34. Employees hired on or after July 1, 108 2014, or employees who choose to move from the grandfathered 109 salary schedule to the performance salary schedule shall be 110 compensated pursuant to the performance salary schedule once 111 they have received the appropriate performance evaluation for 112 this purpose. 113 a.âBase salary.âThe base salary shall be established as 114 follows: 115 (I)âThe base salary for instructional personnel or school 116 administrators who opt into the performance salary schedule 117 shall be the salary paid in the prior year, including 118 adjustments only. 119 (II)âInstructional personnel or school administrators new 120 to the district, returning to the district after a break in 121 service without an authorized leave of absence, or appointed for 122 the first time to a position in the district in the capacity of 123 instructional personnel or school administrator shall be placed 124 on the performance salary schedule. 125 b.âSalary adjustments.âSalary adjustments for highly 126 effective or effective performance shall be established as 127 follows: 128 (I)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 129 salary schedule for an employee rated as highly effective must 130 be at least 25 percent greater than the highest annual salary 131 adjustment available to an employee of the same classification 132 through any other salary schedule adopted by the district. 133 (II)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 134 salary schedule for an employee rated as effective must be equal 135 to at least 50 percent and no more than 75 percent of the annual 136 adjustment provided for a highly effective employee of the same 137 classification. 138 (III)âA salary schedule shall not provide An annual salary 139 adjustment shall only be provided for an employee who receives a 140 rating of other than highly effective or effective for the year. 141 c.âSalary supplements.âIn addition to the salary 142 adjustments, each district school board shall provide for salary 143 supplements for activities that must include, but are not 144 limited to: 145 (I)âAssignment to a Title I eligible school. 146 (II)âAssignment to a school that earned a grade of âFâ or 147 three consecutive grades of âDâ pursuant to s. 1008.34 such that 148 the supplement remains in force for at least 1 year following 149 improved performance in that school. 150 (III)âCertification and teaching in high-demand teacher 151 needs areas. Statewide high-demand teacher needs areas shall be 152 identified by the State Board of Education under s. 1012.07. 153 However, the district school board may identify other areas of 154 high-demand needs within the school district for purposes of 155 this sub-sub-subparagraph and may remove areas identified by the 156 state board which do not apply within the school district. 157 (IV)âAssignment of additional academic responsibilities. 158 159 If budget constraints in any given year limit a district school 160 boardâs ability to fully fund all adopted salary schedules, the 161 performance salary schedule shall not be reduced on the basis of 162 total cost or the value of individual awards in a manner that is 163 proportionally greater than reductions to any other salary 164 schedules adopted by the district. Any compensation for 165 longevity of service awarded to instructional personnel who are 166 on any other salary schedule must be included in calculating the 167 salary adjustments required by sub-subparagraph b. 168 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.